Missouri, session 2026, HB3071.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 442.055, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 442.055, to read as follows:
442.055. 1. In the event that any premises currently rented, leased, sold,
transferred, or conveyed or any premises to be rented, leased, sold, transferred, or
conveyed is or was previously contaminated with radioactive material or other hazardous
material, the owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor shall disclose in writing to the
prospective lessee, current lessee, purchaser, or transferee the fact the premises is or was
previously contaminated with radioactive material or other hazardous material; provided that,
the owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor has empirically supported knowledge of such
radioactive or other hazardous contamination. In the event that an owner, seller, landlord, or
other transferor does not make the disclosure as required under this section, and the person
had knowledge of such radioactive or other hazardous contamination, the person shall be
guilty of a class A misdemeanor. As used in this section, the term "knowledge" shall require
the receipt by the owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor of a [report stating affirmatively]
written or electronic communication from a governmental agency that the premises is or
was previously contaminated with radioactive material or other hazardous material. If any
lessee learns that the owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor had knowledge and
failed to disclose such knowledge to the lessee, the lessee has the right to terminate his or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3071 2
her lease at no cost to the lessee under the notification, security deposit, and grace
period requirements stipulated in the lease.
2. If any governmental agency requests from an owner, seller, landlord, or other
transferor a signed right of entry to test for radioactive material or other hazardous
material contamination, the owner, seller, landlord, or other transferor shall disclose in
writing to the prospective lessee, current lessee, purchaser, or transferee such request
for a signed right of entry.
3. If any state agency has knowledge of contamination of radioactive material or
other hazardous waste material at any residential property, the state agency shall send
written notice to the current resident within thirty days.
✔